Utah statutes.
26-8a-209.   Fully automated external defibrillator statewide database.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the department shall establish and
maintain a statewide database containing the following information:
(a)  the name of the owner of a fully automated external defibrillator; and
(b)  the precise location of the fully automated external defibrillator,
including the address and the place in which the defibrillator is stored.
(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4):
(a)  the department shall give the information from the database to emergency
medical service dispatch centers in the state; and
(b)  emergency medical dispatch centers in the state may disclose the nearest
location of a fully automated external defibrillator to a person calling the
dispatch center in the event of a medical emergency and to first responders in
an emergency.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (4):
(a)  a commercial owner of a fully automated external defibrillator shall
register the ownership and precise location of the defibrillator with the
department within 30 days of acquisition of the defibrillator;
(b)  an owner of a fully automated external defibrillator purchased for use in
a private residence may register the ownership and precise location of the
defibrillator with the department; and
(c)  the department may not impose penalties on a manufacturer or an owner of
a fully automated external defibrillator for failing to comply with the
requirements of this section.
(4)  Beginning on September 1, 2009:
(a)  the provisions of this section are no longer in effect; and
(b)  the provisions of Title 26, Chapter 8b, Utah Sudden Cardiac Arrest
Survival Act, supersede the provisions of this section.
(5)  On or before August 1, 2009, the department shall provide to each
emergency medical dispatch center, as defined in Section 26-8b-102, all
information contained in the statewide database that pertains to the area for
which the emergency medical dispatch center provides emergency dispatch
services.
(6)  Beginning on the date that the department provides the information
required under Subsection (5), and continuing on a weekly basis until
September 1, 2009, the department shall provide any additional information
that it receives for the statewide database to the emergency medical dispatch
centers described in Subsection (5).
